District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.43

Transition.

For a period of 2 years following March 6, 2007, all references in this chapter to surgical assistants shall be deemed to refer to persons meeting the requirements for licensure in the District, regardless of whether they are licensed in fact.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 643
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-228, § 2(i), 53 DCR 10244

Cross References

Licensing of health professionals, general qualifications of applicants, see § 3-1205.03.